Maryland, session 2025, SB0749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
4–306.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ADEX” means the American Board of Dental Examiners, Inc., or its
successor organization.
(3) (i) “ADHLEX” means the American Dental Hygiene Licensing
Examination designed and developed by ADEX, or its successor examination.
(ii) “ADHLEX” includes a written component and a clinical
component.
(4) (i) “ADLEX” means the American Dental Licensing Examination
designed and developed by ADEX, or its successor examination.
(ii) “ADLEX” includes a written component and a clinical
component.
(b) (1) A dentist licensed in any other state shall be issued a license in this
State if the applicant:
(i) 1. Has passed the ADLEX; and

SENATE BILL 749 3
2. Has passed the Maryland Dental Jurisprudence
Examination given by the Board or its designee; or
(ii) 1. For the 5 preceding years, has been actively engaged in
practicing dentistry for at least 850 hours on average per year;
2. Has passed an examination with a clinical component as a
requirement for licensure in another state;
3. Has passed a comprehensive written examination on
applied clinical diagnosis and treatment planning administered by ADEX; and
4. Has passed the Maryland Dental Jurisprudence
Examination given by the Board or its designee.
(2) A dental hygienist licensed in any other state shall be issued a license
in this State if the applicant:
(i) 1. Has passed the ADHLEX; and
2. Has passed the Maryland Dental Hygiene Jurisprudence
Examination given by the Board or its designee; or
(ii) 1. For the 3 preceding years, has been actively engaged in
practicing dental hygiene for at least 150 hours on average per year;
2. Has passed an examination with a clinical component as a
requirement for licensure in another state;
3. Has passed a comprehensive written examination on
applied clinical diagnosis and treatment planning administered by ADEX; and
4. Has passed the Maryland Dental Hygiene Jurisprudence
Examination given by the Board or its designee.
(c) (1) The Board may adopt regulations for the content and administration of
examinations and any other regulations necessary to provide for the licensure of
individuals who apply for a license to practice dentistry under subsection (b)(1) of this
section.
(2) The Board may adopt regulations for the content and administration of
examinations and any other regulations necessary to provide for the licensure of
individuals who apply for a license to practice dental hygiene under subsection (b)(2) of this
section.
(d) An applicant for a general license to practice dentistry under this section shall:

SENATE BILL 749
(1) Pay the application fee required by § 4–304 of this subtitle; and
(2) Provide adequate evidence that the applicant:
(i) Meets the qualifications otherwise required by this title for a
general license to practice dentistry;
(ii) Holds a license to practice dentistry in another state;
(iii) Has satisfied the examination requirements provided in
subsection (b)(1) of this section;
(iv) Is not being investigated by a disciplinary authority of another
state, does not have charges pending against the applicant’s license, and has not been
disciplined by a disciplinary or licensing authority of any other state or country, or been
convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country for an act that would be grounds
for disciplinary action under § 4–315 of this subtitle; and
(v) Has not previously failed an examination for licensure as a
dentist in this State.
(e) An applicant for a general license to practice dental hygiene under this section
shall:
(1) Pay the application fee required by § 4–304 of this subtitle; and
(2) Provide adequate evidence that the applicant:
(i) Meets the qualifications otherwise required by this title for a
general license to practice dental hygiene;
(ii) Holds a license to practice dental hygiene in another state;
(iii) Has satisfied the examination requirements provided in
subsection (b)(2) of this section;
(iv) Is not being investigated by a disciplinary authority of another
state, does not have charges pending against the applicant’s license, and has not been
disciplined by a disciplinary or licensing authority of any other state or country, or been
convicted or disciplined by a court of any state or country for an act that would be grounds
for disciplinary action under § 4–315 of this subtitle; and
(v) Has not previously failed an examination for licensure as a
dental hygienist in this State.

SENATE BILL 749 5
(F) IF AN APPLICANT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSURE UNDER
THIS SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL ISSUE THE LICENSE WITHIN 15 BUSINESS DAYS
AFTER RECEIVING THE COMPLETED APPLICATION.
4–505.
(a) The Board of Dental Examiners shall:
(1) Define, for the purpose of this section, the terms “dental radiation
technologist” and “practice dental radiation technology”;
(2) Adopt rules and regulations concerning qualifications, training,
certification, monitoring of, and enforcement requirements for a dental radiation
technologist; and
(3) Provide for a requirement to ensure competency in new safety and
technological advances.
(b) The qualifications required of applicants for Board certification as a dental
radiation technologist shall include requirements established by:
(1) The American Dental Association; or
(2) Any applicable federal standards for training and certification.
(c) After July 1, 1988, an individual must be certified by the Board as a dental
radiation technologist before a licensed dentist may employ the individual to practice
dental radiation technology.
(d) After July 1, 1988, an individual may not practice dental radiation technology
unless certified by the Board.
(e) At least 1 month before a certificate expires, the Board shall send to each
certificate holder, by electronic means or first–class mail to the last known electronic or
physical address of the certificate holder, a renewal notice that states:
(1) The date on which the current certificate expires;
(2) The date by which the renewal application must be received by the
Board for the renewal to be issued and mailed before the certificate expires; and
(3) The amount of the renewal fee.
(f) An individual may be simultaneously certified as a dental radiation
technologist under this section and as an expanded function dental assistant.

SENATE BILL 749
4–505.1.
(A) A DENTAL RADIATION TECHNOLOGIST AUTHORIZED TO PRACTICE IN
ANOTHER STATE SHALL BE ISSUED A CERTIFICATE IN THIS STATE IF THE
APPLICANT:
(1) PAYS THE APPLICATION FEE REQUIRED BY THE BOARD; AND
(2) PROVIDES ADEQUATE EVIDENCE THAT THE APPLICANT:
(I) MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS OTHERWISE REQUIRED
UNDER THIS TITLE FOR A CERTIFICATION TO PRACTICE DENTAL RADIATION
TECHNOLOGY;
(II) HAS SATISFIED THE EXAMINATION REQUIREMENT FOR
CERTIFICATION OF ANOTHER STATE THAT THE BOARD DETERMINES IS
COMPARABLE TO THE EXAMINATION REQUIREMENT IN THIS STATE;
(III) IS NOT BEING INVESTIGATED BY A DISCIPLINARY
AUTHORITY OF ANOTHER STATE, DOES NOT HAVE CHARGES PENDING AGAINST THE
APPLICANT’S CERTIFICATION, AND HAS NOT BEEN DISCIPLINED BY A DISCIPLINARY
OR CERTIFYING AUTHORITY OF ANOTHER STATE OR COUNTRY, OR BEEN CONVICTED
OR DISCIPLINED BY A COURT OF ANY STATE OR COUNTRY FOR AN ACT THAT WOULD
BE GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION UNDER § 4–315 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(IV) HAS NOT PREVIOUSLY FAILED AN EXAMINATION FOR
CERTIFICATION AS A DENTAL RADIATION TECHNOLOGIST IN THIS STATE.
(B) IF AN APPLICANT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTIFICATION
UNDER THIS SECTION, THE BOARD SHALL ISSUE THE CERTIFICATE WITHIN 15
BUSINESS DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE COMPLETED APPLICATION.
(C) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT ANY REGULATIONS NECESSARY TO PROVIDE
FOR THE CERTIFICATION OF INDIVIDUALS WHO APPLY FOR A CERTIFICATION TO
PRACTICE DENTAL RADIATION THERAPY UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Health shall develop a plan for a temporary or
permanent authorization to practice a health occupation in the State for individuals who:
(1) are not licensed or otherwise authorized to practice the health occupation
in the State;

SENATE BILL 749 7
(2) hold a license or other authorization issued by another state that is
equivalent to the license or other authorization required to practice the health occupation in
this State; and
(3) left employment with a federal agency after January 20, 2025.
(b) On or before October 1, 2025, the Department shall submit the plan, including
any necessary statutory changes, to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health
and Government Operations Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act shall
take effect October 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
3 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.